Arkansas, session 2025, SB295.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-4-123(a), concerning the use of funds
appropriated for election expenses, is amended to add an additional
subdivision to read as follows:
(8) Election monitoring, including without limitation the
compensation for certified election monitors of the State Board of Election
Commissioners.








*SSS135*
02/25/2025 9:01:51 AM SSS135